Arkansas, session 2025, HB1079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Coverage for Genetic Testing for Inherited Gene Mutation and
Evidence-based Cancer Imaging

23-79-2901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Clinical utility" means a test result that provides
information that is used in the formulation of a treatment or monitoring
strategy that informs a patient's outcome and impacts the clinical decision.
(B) "Clinical utility" includes the most appropriate test
that may include both information that is actionable and some information
*ANS096*
04-02-2025 11:48:52 ANS096

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H3/17/25 S4/2/25 HB1079
that cannot be immediately used in the formulation of a clinical decision;
(2) "Evidence-based cancer imaging" means appropriate preventive
screening and imaging supported by evidence;
(3) "Genetic testing for an inherited gene mutation" means
testing for an inherited gene mutation associated with an increased risk of
cancer;
(4)(A) "Health benefit plan" means an individual, blanket, or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued, renewed, or
extended in this state by a healthcare insurer, health maintenance
organization, hospital medical service corporation, or self-insured
governmental or church plan in this state.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) Medical payments under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan;
(5)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means any insurance company,
hospital and medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization
that issues or delivers health benefit plans in this state and is subject to
any of the following laws:
04-02-2025 11:48:52 ANS096

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H3/17/25 S4/2/25 HB1079
(i) The insurance laws of this state;
(ii) Section 23-75-101 et seq., pertaining to
hospital and medical service corporations; or
(iii) Section 23-76-101 et seq., pertaining to
health maintenance organizations.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(6) "Healthcare provider" means a person who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer
healthcare services; and
(7) "Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines" means
evidence-based clinical practice guidelines that:
(A) Are developed by independent organizations or medical
professional societies:
(i) Using a transparent methodology and reporting
structure; and
(ii) With a conflict of interest policy; and
(B) Establish standards of care that are informed by:
(i) A systemic review of evidence; and
(ii) An assessment of the benefits and costs of
alternative care options that includes without limitation recommendations
intended to optimize patient care.

23-79-2902. Coverage for genetic testing for inherited gene mutation
and evidence-based cancer imaging.
(a) Beginning on and after January 1, 2026, a health benefit plan that
is offered, issued, or renewed in this state shall provide coverage for:
(1) Genetic testing for an inherited gene mutation in a clinical
setting for an individual with a personal or family history of cancer if the
genetic testing for an inherited gene mutation:
(A) Provides clinical utility; and
(B) Is ordered or recommended by a healthcare provider and
is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including without
limitation:
(i) The National Comprehensive Cancer Network
clinical practice recommendations that are level 2a or higher;
04-02-2025 11:48:52 ANS096

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H3/17/25 S4/2/25 HB1079
(ii) Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services
national coverage determinations or Medicare administrative contractor local
coverage determinations; or
(iii) Nationally recognized clinical practice
guidelines; and
(2) Evidence-based cancer imaging for an individual at an
increased risk of developing cancer if the evidence-based cancer imaging:
(A) Provides clinical utility; and
(B) Is ordered or recommended by a healthcare provider
according to:
(i) The National Comprehensive Cancer Network
clinical practice recommendations that are level 2a or higher; or
(ii) Nationally recognized clinical practice
guidelines.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the
coverage for genetic testing for inherited gene mutation and evidence-based
cancer imaging under subsection (a) of this section:
(A) Is not subject to an annual deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance limit as established for other covered benefits under a health
benefit plan; and
(B) Does not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable
under a health benefit plan.
(2) This subsection does not apply to:
(A) A plan providing health benefits to state and public
school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.; or
(B) A self-funded governmental plan.
(c)(1) If application of this section would result in health savings
account ineligibility under guidance issued by the United States Department
of the Treasury under 26 U.S.C. § 223, as it existed on January 1, 2025, then
this section shall apply only to health savings accounts with qualified high
deductible health plans with respect to the deductible of a health benefit
plan after the individual has satisfied the minimum deductible.
(2) This section does apply to items or services that are
considered to be preventive care under 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C), as it
existed on January 1, 2025, whether or not the minimum deductible has been
satisfied.
04-02-2025 11:48:52 ANS096

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H3/17/25 S4/2/25 HB1079

23-79-2903. Rules.
The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules to implement and
administer this subchapter.

/s/F. Allen






























04-02-2025 11:48:52 ANS096